Washington statutes.
RCW 18.96.090

Examinations.

(1) Examinations of landscape architects for certificates of licensure shall be held at least annually at such time and place as the board determines.

(2) The board shall determine the content, scope, and grading process of the examination. The board may adopt an appropriate national examination and grading procedure.

(3) Applicants who fail to pass any section of the examination shall be permitted to retake the parts failed as prescribed by the board. If the entire examination is not successfully completed within five years, a retake of the entire examination is required.

(4) Applicants for licensure may begin taking the examination upon graduating from an accredited landscape architecture program if the applicant is employed under the supervision of a registered or licensed landscape architect.

(5) The director shall issue a certificate of licensure to qualified applicants as provided in RCW 18.96.150.

[ 2009 c 370 s 9; 1993 c 35 s 3; 1985 c 18 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 158 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 370 ss 1-16, 18, 20, and 21: See note following RCW 18.96.010.

Finding—2009 c 370: See note following RCW 18.96.010.

Effective date—1985 c 18: See note following RCW 18.96.040.